DI-619
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DIATK-01

DTC B 1148/36 Front Airbag Sensor RH Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The front airbag sensor RH circuit consists of the diagnosis circuit and frontal deceleration sensor, etc.

If receives signals from the frontal deceleration sensor, judges whether or not the SRS must be activated,
and detects diagnosis system malfunction.

DTC B1148/36 is recorded when occurrence of a malfunction in the front airbag sensor RH is detected.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
e Frontairbag sensor RH
* Airbag sensorassembly

B1148/36 « Frontairbag sensor RH malfunction e Dashwire

* EngineroomNo. 2 wire

* Engineroommain wire

HINT:

DTC B1148/36 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag
(dual stege airbag).
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Is DTC B1148/36 output?

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
ON conds.
@ (b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.
DLC3 (d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
DTC B1148/36 conds.

DTCB 1148/36is output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1148/36 may be output at this time, but

oY 16830 nizos| theyarenotrelevanttothis check.

T (e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).
UL | oK
CG TC

normal. To make sure of this, use the simulation
method to check.

NO> The malfunctioning part can now be considered

YES

2 [Is connector of front airbag sensor RH properly connected?

No> Connect connector.

YES

3 | Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on DI-764).

A
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DI-621

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM
4 | Check wire harness.
PREPARATION:
] Using aservice wire, connect+SRand -SRonthefrontairbag
Front Airbag sensor RH side between the front airbag sensor RH and the air-
ggﬁ:gmii: HIHTH /Séggﬁfuy bag sensorassembly.
7 " ] CHECK:
Aitbag S Measuretheresistance between+SRand  -SRontheairbag
+SR [ | -SR Agsear?'lblinsor sensorassembly side between the front airbag sensor RH and
the airbag sensor assembly.
OO0 || ok
) —) SR Resistance: Below 1 Q
(_) ¢ -SR
H21265
H03360H03356 H21718
NG> Go to step 8.
OK

5 | Check wire harness (to ground).

Zfbn;g ] Airbag

Sensorl: D—[D—[D—E :l Sensor

RH {} :| Assembly|
Airbag Sensor Assembly

H21557 =

HO3361 H21719
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CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SRand -SRontheairbagsensorassembly side betweenthe
frontairbag sensor RH and the airbag sensorassembly.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NGéﬂ tostep 10.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

6 | Check wire harness (to B+).

Zfobm ]Airbag
sensor L| [T {Isensor
RH ]Assembly
Airbag Sensor Assembly
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PREPARATION:

Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait

atleastfor2seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turntheignition switchto ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each

of+SRand -SRontheairbagsensorassembly side be-

tween the front airbag sensor RH and the airbag sensor
assembly.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1V

NGé&\ tostep 12.
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DI-623
SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

7 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Zrobm ]Airbag
slern:gr [ m ':D ]Sensor
LH ]Assembly
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OK
~_—

PREPARATION:

(@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Change the front airbag sensor LH position with RH posi-
tion.

(e) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
Neither DTC B1148/36 nor B1149/37 are not output.

HINT:

Codes other than code B1148/36 or B1149/37 may be output
at this time, but they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace airbag sensor assembly
(DTC B1148/36 is output).

NG>

Replace front airbag sensor RH
(DTC B1149/37 is output).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)



DI-624

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

8 [ Check engine room main wire.

Engine Room
Main Wire

Front

RH

+SRf = -SR

H21555
H03360H09507

Sonee: [ BJ—_E =T [Isensor

]Airbag

]Assembly

H21722

OK

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the
airbag sensor assembly side.

(b) Using a service wire, connect +SR and —SR of the engine
room main wire connector on the front airbag sensor RH
side.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between +SR and —-SR of the engine

room main wire connector on the airbag sensor assembly side.

OK:

Resistance: Below 1 Q

NG Repair or replace engine room main wire.

9 [Check engine room No. 2 wire.

Engine Room Dash Wire
Main Wire  Engine Room
No. 2 Wire ]
Front <~ — i
Airoag BJ:E Airbag
Sensor Sensor
RH ﬂ ¢ ]Assembly
*SRED] SR 4sr [.B,[ -sr
1
H21554 (+) (_)
HO03360H16251 H21723
OK

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from
the dash wire.

(b) Using a service wire, connect +SR and —SR of the engine
room No. 2 wire connector on the engine room main wire
side.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between +SR and —-SR of the engine

room No. 2 wire connector on the dash wire side.

OK:

Resistance: Below 1 Q

NG Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

Repair or replace dash wire.
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SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

10 | Check engine room main wire (to ground).

Engine Room

Main Wire
z?b”;g - :| Airbag
Sensor [ D:[D:D ]Sensor
RH :| Assembly
ren) -
L\l '
(—)/Q\ ()
NS
Ho3385 H21724
OK

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the airbag
sensor assembly side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SR and -SR of the engine room main wire connector on the
airbag sensor assembly side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

)

Repair or replace engine room main wire.

11 | Check engine room No. 2 wire (to ground).

Engine Room Dash Wire
No. 2 Wire
Front ]Airbag
é'éﬁ?gr 0 0= Sensor
RH ]Assembly
e fm—
=
+SR J[o=o |\ -SR
( i[5\ (]
) () J%?
Hasz 1o H21725
OK

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire conector from the dash
wire.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SR and —SR of the engine room No. 2 wire connector on the
dash wire side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

o )

Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

Repair or replace dash wire.
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12 | Check engine room main wire (to B+).

Engine Room PREPARATION:
Main Wire (&)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
Front - ]Airbag (b) Disconnect t.he negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
Airbag D:[D:D Sensor tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
pensor ]Assembly (c) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the
x airbag sensor assembly side.
(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
of +SR and -SR of the engine room main wire connector
on the airbag sensor assembly side.

OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

H21553
AB0119 H03364 H21726

NG> Repair or replace engine room main wire.
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13 | Check engine room No. 2 wire (to B+).

Dash Wi PREPARATION:
Engine Room ~ -asn Wire (@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
No. 2 Wire (b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
Front :l Airbag .
Airbag [ :| Sensor tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
;eHnsor i Assembly| | (¢)  Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from
the dash wire.

(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,

ON and wait at least for 2 seconds.
@ == CHECK:
+SR J oS |\ -SR (@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
J=E (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
) (+)[ ] of +SR and —SR of the engine room No. 2 wire connector
\Y on the dash wire side.

= OK:

H21552
ABD119 H16253 T H21727

Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.
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